csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_Ind_C.yaml
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3PlProx: owaabamigonaawaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3PlProx: owaabamigonaawaa
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: niwaabamaag
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: giwaabamaawaag
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: giwaabamaag
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+3PlProx: owaabamigowaa'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+3PlProx: owaabamigowaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: niwaabamaanaanig
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: giwaabamaanaanig
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx: waabamaawag
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3PlProx: owaabamigosiinaawaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3PlProx: owaabamigosiinaawaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: niwaabamaasiibaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: giwaabamaasiwaawaabaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: giwaabamaasiibaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+3PlProx: owaabamigosiiwaabane'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+3PlProx: owaabamigosiiwaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: niwaabamaasiwaanaabaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: giwaabamaasiwaanaabaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx: waabamaasiibaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3PlProx: owaabamigonaawaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3PlProx: owaabamigonaawaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: niwaabamaabaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: giwaabamaawaabaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: giwaabamaabaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+3PlProx: owaabamigowaabane'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+3PlProx: owaabamigowaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: niwaabamaanaabaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: giwaabamaanaabaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProx: waabamaabaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv: niwaabamimaasiidogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv: giwaabamimaasiwaawaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv: giwaabamimaasiidogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv: owaabamaasiwaawaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv: owaabamaasiidogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv: niwaabamimaasiwaanaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv: giwaabamimaasiwaanaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv: waabamimaasiidogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv: niwaabamimaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv: giwaabamimaawaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv: giwaabamimaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv: owaabamaawaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv: owaabamaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv: niwaabamimaanaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv: giwaabamimaanaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv: waabamimaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv: niwaabamimaasiin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv: giwaabamimaasiwaawaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv: giwaabamimaasiin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv: owaabamaasiwaawaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv: owaabamaasiin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv: niwaabamimaasiwaanaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv: giwaabamimaasiwaanaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv: waabamimaasiiwan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv: niwaabamimaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv: giwaabamimaawaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv: giwaabamimaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv: owaabamaawaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv: owaabamaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv: niwaabamimaanaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv: giwaabamimaanaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv: waabamimaawan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv: niwaabamimaasiibanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv: giwaabamimaasiwaawaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv: giwaabamimaasiibanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv: owaabamaasiwaawaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv: owaabamaasiibanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv: niwaabamimaasiwaanaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv: giwaabamimaasiwaanaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv: waabamimaasiibanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv: niwaabamimaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv: giwaabamimaawaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv: giwaabamimaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv: owaabamaawaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv: owaabamaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgObv: niwaabamimaanaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgObv: giwaabamimaanaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgObv: waabamimaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: owaabamigosiininaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: owaabamigosiininaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: owaabamigoninaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: owaabamigoninaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: owaabamigosiinini
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: owaabamigosiinini
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: owaabamigonini
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: owaabamigonini
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: owaabamigosiininaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: owaabamigosiininaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: owaabamigoninaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: owaabamigoninaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3SgProx: owaabamigosiinaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3SgProx: owaabamigosiinaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: niwaabamaasiidog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: giwaabamaasiwaawaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: giwaabamaasiidog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+3SgProx: owaabamigosiidogena'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+3SgProx: owaabamigosiidogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: niwaabamaasiwaanaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: giwaabamaasiwaanaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx: waabamaasiidog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3SgProx: owaabamigonaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3SgProx: owaabamigonaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: niwaabamaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: giwaabamaawaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: giwaabamaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+3SgProx: owaabamigodogena'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+3SgProx: owaabamigodogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: niwaabamaanaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: giwaabamaanaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx: waabamaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3SgProx: owaabamigosiinan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3SgProx: owaabamigosiin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: niwaabamaasiin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: giwaabamaasiwaawaa
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: giwaabamaasiin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+3SgProx: owaabamigosii'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+3SgProx: owaabamigosiin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: niwaabamaasiwaanaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: giwaabamaasiwaanaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx: waabamaasiin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3SgProx: owaabamigonan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgProx: owaabamigon
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: niwaabamaa
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: giwaabamaawaa
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: giwaabamaa
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+3SgProx: owaabamigoo'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+3SgProx: owaabamigoon
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: niwaabamaanaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: giwaabamaanaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx: waabamaa
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3SgProx: owaabamigosiinaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3SgProx: owaabamigosiinaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: niwaabamaasiiban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: giwaabamaasiwaawaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: giwaabamaasiiban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+3SgProx: owaabamigosiibane'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+3SgProx: owaabamigosiibanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: niwaabamaasiwaanaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: giwaabamaasiwaanaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx: waabamaasiiban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3SgProx: owaabamigonaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3SgProx: owaabamigonaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: niwaabamaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: giwaabamaawaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: giwaabamaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+3SgProx: owaabamigobane'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+3SgProx: owaabamigobanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: niwaabamaanaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: giwaabamaanaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProx: waabamaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+Excl: niwaabamigosiiminaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+Excl: niwaabamigosiiminaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl: giwaabamisiiminaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl: giwaabamisiiminaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: niwaabamigosiinaadogenag
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: niwaabamigosiinaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Excl: niwaabamigoosiiminaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+Excl: niwaabamigominaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+Excl: niwaabamigominaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl: giwaabamiminaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl: giwaabamiminaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: niwaabamigonaadogenag
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: niwaabamigonaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Excl: niwaabamigoominaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+Excl: niwaabamigosiimin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+Excl: niwaabamigosiimin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl: giwaabamisiimin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl: giwaabamisiimin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: niwaabamigosiinaanig
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: niwaabamigosiinaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Excl: niwaabamigoosiimin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+Excl: niwaabamigomin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+Excl: niwaabamigomin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl: giwaabamimin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl: giwaabamimin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: niwaabamigonaanig
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: niwaabamigonaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Excl: niwaabamigoomin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+Excl: niwaabamigosiiminaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+Excl: niwaabamigosiiminaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl: giwaabamisiiminaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl: giwaabamisiiminaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: niwaabamigonaabaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: niwaabamigosiinaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Excl: niwaabamigoosiiminaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+Excl: niwaabamigominaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+Excl: niwaabamigominaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl: giwaabamiminaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl: giwaabamiminaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: niwaabamigosiinaabaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: niwaabamigonaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Excl: niwaabamigoominaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+Incl: giwaabamigosiiminaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+Incl: giwaabamigosiiminaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: giwaabamigosiinaadogenag
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: giwaabamigosiinaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Incl: giwaabamigoosiiminaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+Incl: giwaabamigominaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+Incl: giwaabamigominaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: giwaabamigonaadogenag
